California statutes. Penal Code
(C) If the defendant performs satisfactorily on diversion pursuant to this section, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion.

(2) Refer the defendant to the CARE Act court pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the defendant or counsel for the defendant agrees to the referral and the court has
 reason to believe that the defendant may be eligible for the CARE program. The CARE Act court shall hold a hearing to determine eligibility for the CARE program within 30 court days after the date of the referral. If the hearing is delayed beyond 30 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in a county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into the CARE program, the CARE Act court shall notify the criminal court of the acceptance, and the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 six months after the date of the referral to the CARE program, unless the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that six-month time period. If the defendant is not accepted into the CARE program or if the CARE Act court refers the defendant back to criminal court before the expiration of the six-month
 time period, the court shall proceed as provided in paragraph (1). Except as provided in this section and Sections 5978 and 5978.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, this paragraph does not alter the confidential nature of CARE program proceedings.

(c) If the court finds the defendant ineligible or unsuitable for diversion based on the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (g) of Section 1001.36, the court shall, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine which one of the following actions the court will take:

(1) Order modification of an existing mental health diversion treatment plan in accordance with a recommendation from the treatment provider.

(2) Refer the defendant to assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A referral to assisted outpatient treatment may only occur in a county where services are available pursuant to Section 5348 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the agency agrees to accept responsibility for treatment of the defendant. A hearing to determine eligibility for assisted outpatient treatment shall be held within 45 days after the finding of incompetency. If the hearing is delayed beyond 45 days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into assisted outpatient treatment, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 six months after the date of the referral to assisted outpatient treatment, unless the defendant’s case has been
 referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. This section does not alter the confidential nature of assisted outpatient treatment.

(3) Refer the defendant to the county conservatorship investigator in the county of commitment for possible conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be referred to the conservatorship investigator if, based on the opinion of a qualified mental health expert, the defendant appears to be gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county of commitment. The
 court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the county mental health director or the director’s designee and shall notify the county mental health director or their designee of the outcome of the proceedings. Before establishing a conservatorship, the public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a petition is not filed within 30 days of the referral, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending conservatorship proceedings. If the outcome of the conservatorship proceedings results in the filing of a petition for the establishment of a temporary or permanent conservatorship, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 90 days after the date of the filing of the petition, unless
 the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. This section does not alter the confidential nature of conservatorship proceedings.

(4) Refer the defendant to the CARE Act court pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The CARE Act court shall hold a hearing to determine eligibility for the CARE program within 14 court days after the date that the petition is filed. If the hearing is delayed beyond 14 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in a county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into the
 CARE program, the CARE Act court shall notify the criminal court of the acceptance, and the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 six months after the date of the referral to the CARE program, unless the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. Except as provided in this section and Sections 5978 and 5978.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, this paragraph does not alter the confidential nature of CARE program proceedings.

(5) If the defendant does not qualify for services pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, dismiss the charges.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that a defendant subject to the terms of this section receive mental health treatment in a treatment facility and not a jail. A term of four
 days will be deemed to have been served for every two days spent in actual custody against the maximum period of treatment pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (4) of subdivision (c) and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), if applicable. A defendant not in actual custody shall otherwise receive day for day credit against the term of treatment from the date the defendant is accepted into treatment in the event that the criminal charges have not previously been dismissed. “Actual custody” has the same meaning as in Section 4019.

(e) The county behavioral health agency and jail medical providers may share confidential medical records and other relevant information with the court, including, but not limited to, prior interactions with and treatment of the defendant, for the purpose of determining likelihood of eligibility for behavioral
 health
 services and programs pursuant to this section. The disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision is subject to applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(f) This section shall apply only as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1367.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the court shall consider all treatment options as provided in this section prior to dismissing criminal charges. However, nothing in this section limits a court’s discretion pursuant to Section 1385.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.015.

A person committed to the care of the State Department of State Hospitals because he or she is incompetent to stand trial or to be adjudged to punishment is eligible for compassionate release pursuant to Section 4146
 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In any case in which the criteria for compassionate release apply, the State Department of State Hospitals shall follow the procedures and standards in Section 4146 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to determine if the department should recommend to the court that the person’s commitment for treatment and the underlying criminal charges be
 suspended for compassionate release.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.02.

(a) If the defendant is found mentally competent during a postrelease community supervision or parole revocation hearing, the revocation proceedings shall resume. The formal hearing on the revocation shall occur within a reasonable time after resumption of the proceedings, but in no event may the defendant be detained in custody for over 180 days from the date of arrest.

(b) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent, the
 court shall dismiss the pending revocation matter and return the defendant to supervision. If the revocation matter is dismissed pursuant to this subdivision, the court may, using the least restrictive option to meet the mental health needs of the defendant, also do any of the following:

(1) Modify the terms and conditions of supervision to include appropriate mental health treatment.

(2) Refer the matter to any local mental health court, reentry court, or other collaborative justice court available for improving the mental health of the defendant.

(3) Refer the matter to the public guardian of the county of commitment to initiate conservatorship proceedings pursuant to Sections 5352 and 5352.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court shall order the matter to the public guardian pursuant to this paragraph only if there are no other reasonable alternatives to the establishment of a conservatorship to meet the
 mental health needs of the defendant.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a person subject to parole pursuant to Section 3000.1 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 is found mentally incompetent, the court shall order
 the parolee to undergo treatment pursuant to Section 1370 for restoring the person to competency, except that if the parolee is not restored to competency within the maximum period of confinement and the court dismisses the revocation, the court shall return the parolee to parole
 supervision.

(2) If the parolee is returned to parole supervision, the court may, using the least restrictive option to meet the mental health needs of the parolee, do any of the following:

(A) Modify the terms and conditions of parole to include appropriate mental health treatment.

(B) Refer the matter to any local mental health court, reentry court, or other collaborative justice court available for improving the mental health of the parolee.

(C) Refer the matter to the public guardian of the county of commitment to initiate conservatorship proceedings pursuant to Sections 5352 and 5352.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court shall order the matter to the public guardian pursuant to this subparagraph only if there are no other reasonable alternatives to the establishment of a conservatorship to meet the mental health needs of the parolee.

(d) If a conservatorship is established for a defendant or parolee pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), the county or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not compassionately release the defendant or parolee or
 otherwise cause the termination of his or her supervision or parole based on the establishment of that conservatorship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 759, Sec. 9.   (SB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.1.

(a) (1) (A) If the defendant is found mentally competent, the criminal process shall resume, the trial on the offense charged or hearing on the alleged violation shall proceed, and judgment may be pronounced.

(B) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and has been determined by a regional center to have a developmental disability, the trial or judgment shall be suspended until the defendant becomes mentally competent.

(i) Except as provided in clause (ii) or (iii), the court shall consider a recommendation for placement. The recommendation shall be made to the court by
 the director of a regional center or the director’s designee. In the meantime, the court shall order that the mentally incompetent defendant be delivered by the sheriff or other person designated by the court to a state hospital, developmental center, or any other available residential facility approved by the director of a regional center established under Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code as will promote the defendant’s speedy attainment of mental competence, or be placed on outpatient status pursuant to the provisions of Section 1370.4 and Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600).

(ii) When the action against a defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290, the prosecutor shall determine whether the defendant previously
 has been found mentally incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this chapter on a charge of a Section 290 offense, or whether the defendant is currently the subject of a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of an offense specified in Section 290. If either determination is made, the prosecutor shall so notify the court and defendant in writing. After this notification, and opportunity for hearing, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a state hospital or other secure treatment facility for the care and treatment of persons with developmental disabilities unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.

(iii) If the action against the
 defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 and the defendant has been denied bail pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12 of Article I of the California Constitution because the court has found, based upon clear and convincing evidence, a substantial likelihood that the person’s release would result in great bodily harm to others, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a state hospital for the care and treatment of persons with developmental disabilities unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.

(iv) The clerk of the court shall notify the Department of Justice,
 in writing, of a finding of mental incompetence with respect to a defendant who is subject to clause (ii) or (iii) for inclusion in the defendant’s state summary criminal history information.

(C) If the court finds that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the court shall proceed as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). 

(D) Upon becoming competent, the court shall order that the defendant be returned to the committing court pursuant to the procedures set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372 or by another person designated by the court. The court shall further determine conditions under which the person may be absent from the placement for medical
 treatment, social visits, and other similar activities. Required levels of supervision and security for these activities shall be specified.

(E) The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the regional center director or the director’s designee and to the Director of Developmental Services.

(F) A defendant charged with a violent felony may not be placed in a facility or delivered to a state hospital, developmental center, or residential facility pursuant to this subdivision unless the facility, state hospital, developmental center, or residential facility has a secured perimeter or a locked and controlled treatment facility, and the judge determines that the public safety will be protected.

(G) For purposes of this
 paragraph, “violent felony” means an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(H) A defendant charged with a violent felony may be placed on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1370.4 or 1600, only if the court finds that the placement will not pose a danger to the health or safety of others.

(I) As used in this section, “developmental disability” has the same meaning as in Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Prior to making the order directing that the defendant be confined in a state hospital, developmental center, or other residential facility, or be placed on outpatient status, the court shall order the regional center director or the director’s designee to evaluate
 the defendant and to submit to the court, within 15 judicial days of the order, a written recommendation as to whether the defendant should be committed to a state hospital, a developmental center, or to any other available residential facility approved by the regional center director. A person shall not be admitted to a state hospital, developmental center, or other residential facility or accepted for outpatient status under Section 1370.4 without having been evaluated by the regional center director or the director’s designee.

(3) If the court orders that the defendant be confined in a state hospital or other secure treatment facility pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the court shall provide copies of the following documents, which shall be taken with the defendant to the state hospital or other secure
 treatment facility where the defendant is to be confined:

(A) State summary criminal history information.

(B) Any arrest reports prepared by the police department or other law enforcement agency.

(C) Records of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 or a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of an offense specified in Section 290.

(4) When the defendant is committed to a residential facility pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) or the court makes the findings specified in clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (1) to assign the defendant to a facility other than a state hospital or other secure treatment facility, the court shall order that notice be given to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the site of the placement facility of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a charge of an offense specified in Section 290.

(5) (A) If the defendant is committed or transferred to a state hospital or developmental center pursuant to this section, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the executive director of the state hospital or developmental center and the regional center director that the defendant be transferred to a residential facility approved by the regional center director, order the defendant transferred to that
 facility. If the defendant is committed or transferred to a residential facility approved by the regional center director, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the regional center director, transfer the defendant to a state hospital, a developmental center, or to another residential facility approved by the regional center director.

In the event of dismissal of the criminal action or revocation proceedings before the defendant recovers competence, the person shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) or to commitment or detention pursuant to a petition filed pursuant to Section 6502 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

The defendant or prosecuting attorney may contest
 either kind of order of transfer by filing a petition with the court for a hearing, which shall be held if the court determines that sufficient grounds exist. At the hearing, the prosecuting attorney or the defendant may present evidence bearing on the order of transfer. The court shall use the same standards as used in conducting probation revocation hearings pursuant to Section 1203.2.

Prior to making an order for transfer under this section, the court shall notify the defendant, the attorney of record for the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, and the regional center director or designee.

(B) If the defendant is committed to a state hospital or secure treatment facility pursuant to clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and is subsequently transferred to another facility,
 copies of the documents specified in paragraph (3) shall be taken with the defendant to the new facility. The transferring facility shall also notify the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the site of the new facility that the defendant is a person subject to clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(b) (1) Within 90 days of admission of a person committed pursuant to subdivision (a), the executive director or the director’s designee of the state hospital, developmental center, or other facility to which the defendant is committed, shall make a written report to the committing court and the regional center director or a designee concerning the defendant’s progress toward becoming mentally competent. If the defendant is placed on outpatient status, this report
 shall be made to the committing court by the regional center director or the director’s designee. If the defendant has not become mentally competent, but the report discloses a substantial likelihood the defendant will become mentally competent within the next 90 days, the court may order that the defendant remain in the state hospital, developmental center, or other facility or on outpatient status for that period of time. Within 150 days of an admission made pursuant to subdivision (a), or if the defendant becomes mentally competent, the executive director or the director’s designee of the state hospital, developmental center, or other facility to which the defendant is committed shall report to the court and the regional center director or the director’s designee regarding the defendant’s progress toward becoming mentally competent. If the defendant is placed on outpatient status, the regional
 center director or the director’s designee shall make that report to the committing court. The court shall provide copies of all reports under this section to the prosecutor and defense counsel. If the report indicates that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant has become mentally competent, the committing court shall order the defendant to be returned to the court for proceedings pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the regional center director or the director’s designee and to the executive director of the developmental center.

(2) If it is determined by the court that treatment for the defendant’s mental impairment is not being conducted, the defendant shall be returned to the committing court. A copy of this order shall be sent to the regional center director or the
 director’s designee and to the executive director of the developmental center.

(3) At each review by the court specified in this subdivision, the court shall determine if the security level of housing and treatment is appropriate and may make an order in accordance with its determination.

(c) (1) (A) At the end of two years from the date of commitment or a period of commitment equal to the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the information, indictment, or misdemeanor complaint, or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for a violation of probation or mandatory supervision, whichever is shorter, a defendant who has not become mentally competent shall be returned to the
 committing court.

(B) The court shall notify the regional center director or the director’s designee and the executive director of the developmental center of that return and of any resulting court orders.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), in the event of dismissal of the criminal charges before the defendant becomes mentally competent, the defendant shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), or to commitment and detention pursuant to a petition filed pursuant to Section 6502 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If it is found that the person is not subject to commitment or detention pursuant to the applicable provision of
 the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) or to commitment or detention pursuant to a petition filed pursuant to Section 6502 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the individual shall not be subject to further confinement pursuant to this article and the criminal action remains subject to dismissal pursuant to Section 1385. The court shall notify the regional center director and the executive director of the developmental center of any dismissal.

(B) In revocation proceedings alleging a violation of mandatory supervision in which the defendant remains incompetent upon return to court under subparagraph (A), the defendant shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare
 and Institutions Code), or to commitment and detention pursuant to a petition filed pursuant to Section 6502 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If it is found that the person is not subject to commitment or detention pursuant to the applicable provision of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) or to commitment or detention pursuant to a petition filed pursuant to Section 6502 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall reinstate mandatory supervision and modify the terms and conditions of supervision to include appropriate mental health treatment or refer the matter to a local mental health court, reentry court, or other collaborative justice court available for improving the mental health of the defendant. Actions alleging a violation of mandatory supervision are not subject to dismissal under Section 1385.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the criminal action remains subject to dismissal pursuant to Section 1385. If at any time prior to the maximum period of time allowed for proceedings under this article, the regional center director concludes that the behavior of the defendant related to the defendant’s criminal offense has been eliminated during time spent in court-ordered programs, the court may, upon recommendation of the regional center director, dismiss the criminal charges. The court shall transmit a copy of any order of dismissal to the regional center director and to the executive director of the developmental center.

(e) If a defendant is returned to court pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a),
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and the prosecution elects to dismiss and refile charges pursuant to Section 1387, the court shall presume that the defendant is incompetent unless the court is presented with relevant and credible evidence that the defendant is competent. Such evidence may include medical records, witness statements, or reports by qualified medical experts. If the court is satisfied that it has received substantial evidence that the defendant is competent, the court shall proceed as provided in Section 1369. Otherwise, the court shall find that the defendant is not mentally competent to stand trial and proceed as provided in subdivision (c). 

(f) If the defendant is found incompetent after the refiling of charges, the defendant may be further
 committed only for the balance of time remaining pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). The maximum term of commitment as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) applies to the aggregate of all previous commitments. The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of Developmental Services for the purposes of restoration of competency.

(g) For the purpose of this section, “secure treatment facility” does not include, except for state mental hospitals, state developmental centers, and correctional treatment facilities, a facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of, or Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a community
 board and care facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 646, Sec. 5.   (SB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.2.

If a person is adjudged mentally incompetent pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the superior court may dismiss any misdemeanor charge pending against the mentally incompetent person. Ten days notice shall be given to the district attorney of any motion to dismiss pursuant to this section. The court shall transmit a copy of any order dismissing a misdemeanor charge pursuant to this section to the community program director, the county mental health director, or the regional center director and the Director of Developmental Services, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 14.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.3.

A person committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of this chapter may be placed on outpatient status from such commitment as provided in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 547, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.4.

If, in the evaluation ordered by the court under Section 1370.1, the regional center director, or a designee, is of the opinion that the defendant is not a danger to the health and safety of others while on outpatient treatment and will benefit from such treatment, and has obtained the agreement of the person in charge of a residential facility and of the defendant that the defendant will receive and submit to outpatient treatment and that the person in charge of the facility will designate a person to be the outpatient supervisor of the defendant, the court may order the defendant to undergo outpatient treatment. All of the provisions of Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 shall apply where a defendant is placed on outpatient status under this section,
 except that the regional center director shall be substituted for the community program director, the Director of Developmental Services for the Director of State Hospitals, and a residential facility for a treatment facility for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 36.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.5.

(a) A person committed to a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility pursuant to the provisions of Section 1370, 1370.01, 1370.02, or 1370.1, who escapes from or who escapes while being conveyed to or from a state hospital or facility, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or in the state prison for a determinate term of one year and one day. The term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this section shall be served consecutively to any other sentence or commitment.

(b) The medical director or person in charge of a state hospital or other
 public or private mental health facility to which a person has been committed pursuant to the provisions of Section 1370, 1370.01, 1370.02, or 1370.1 shall promptly notify the chief of police of the city in which the hospital or facility is located, or the sheriff of the county if the hospital or facility is located in an unincorporated area, of the escape of the person, and shall request the assistance of the chief of police or sheriff in apprehending the person, and shall within 48 hours of the escape of the person orally notify the court that made the commitment, the prosecutor in the case, and the Department of Justice of the escape.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 759, Sec. 11.   (SB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.6.

(a) If a mentally incompetent defendant is admitted to a county jail treatment facility pursuant to Section 1370, the department shall provide restoration of competency treatment at the county jail treatment facility and shall provide payment to the county jail treatment facility for the reasonable costs of the bed during the restoration of competency treatment as well as for the reasonable costs of any necessary medical treatment not provided within the county jail treatment facility, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the facility.

(1) If the county jail treatment facility is able to provide restoration of competency services, upon approval by the department and subject to funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act, the county jail treatment
 facility may provide those services and the State Department of State Hospitals may provide payment to the county jail treatment facility for the reasonable costs of the bed during the restoration of competency treatment as well as the reasonable costs of providing restoration of competency services and for any necessary medical treatment not provided within the county jail treatment facility, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the facility.

(2) Transportation to a county jail treatment facility for admission and from the facility upon the filing of a certificate of restoration of competency, or for transfer of a person to another county jail treatment facility or to a state hospital, shall be provided by the committing county unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the facility.

(3) In the event the State Department of State Hospitals and a county jail
 treatment facility are determined to be comparatively at fault for any claim, action, loss, or damage which results from their respective obligations under such a contract, each shall indemnify the other to the extent of its comparative fault.

(b) If the community-based residential system is selected by the court pursuant to Section 1370, the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide reimbursement to the community-based residential treatment system for the cost of restoration of competency treatment as negotiated with the State Department of State Hospitals.

(c) The State Department of State Hospitals may provide payment to either a county jail treatment facility or a community-based residential treatment system directly through invoice, or through a contract, at the discretion of the department in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract or
 agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 44.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1371.

The commitment of the defendant, as described in Section 1370, 1370.1, 1370.01, or 1370.02, exonerates his or her bail, or entitles a person, authorized to receive the property of the defendant, to a return of any money he or she may have deposited instead of bail, or gives, to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited any money instead of bail on behalf of the defendant, a right to the return of that money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 759, Sec. 12.   (SB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1372.

(a) (1) If the medical director of a state hospital, a person designated by the State Department of State Hospitals at an entity contracted by the department to provide services to a defendant prior to placement in a treatment program or other facility to which the defendant is committed, or the community program director, county mental health director, or regional center director providing outpatient services, determines that the defendant has regained mental competence, the director or designee shall immediately certify that fact to the court by filing a certificate of restoration with the court by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by confidential electronic transmission. This shall include any certificate of restoration filed by the State Department of State Hospitals based on an evaluation
 conducted pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. For purposes of this section, the date of filing shall be the date on the return receipt.

(2) The court’s order committing an individual to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility pursuant to Section 1370 shall include direction that the sheriff shall redeliver the patient to the court without any further order from the court upon receiving from the state hospital or treatment facility a copy of the certificate of restoration.

(3) The defendant shall be returned to the committing court in the following manner, except that a defendant in county custody that the State Department of State Hospitals has evaluated pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and filed a certificate of restoration with the court shall remain in county custody:

(A) A patient who remains confined in a state hospital or other treatment facility shall be redelivered to the sheriff of the county from which the patient was committed. The sheriff shall immediately return the person from the state hospital or other treatment facility to the court for further proceedings.

(B) The patient who is on outpatient status shall be returned by the sheriff to court through arrangements made by the outpatient treatment supervisor.

(C) In all cases, the patient shall be returned to the committing court no later than 10 days following the filing of a certificate of restoration. The state shall only pay for 10 calendar days for patients who remain in a facility described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code following the filing of a certificate of restoration of competency. The
 State Department of State Hospitals shall report to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature on an annual basis in February, on the number of days that exceed the 10-day limit prescribed in this subparagraph. This report shall include, but not be limited to, a data sheet that itemizes by county the number of days that exceed this 10-day limit during the preceding year.
